California statutes. Education Code
(2) County Office Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team.

(3) The K–12 High Speed Network.

(e) A charter school may apply separately for district-level or school-level
 grants associated with any of the categorical programs specified in subdivision (d).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 538, Sec. 24.   (SB 416)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

47635.

(a) A sponsoring local educational agency shall annually transfer to each of its charter schools funding in lieu of property taxes equal to the lesser of the following two amounts:

(1) The average amount of property taxes per unit of average daily attendance, including average daily attendance attributable to charter schools, received by the local educational agency, multiplied by the charter school’s average daily attendance.

(2) The local control funding formula grant funding computed pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 42238.02, per unit of average daily attendance, multiplied by the charter school’s average daily attendance
 in each of the four corresponding grade level ranges: kindergarten and grades 1, 2, and 3; grades 4, 5, and 6; grades 7 and 8; and grades 9 to 12, inclusive.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (2), until the Superintendent determines that a charter school is funded pursuant to Section 42238.02, the Superintendent shall apportion funding per unit of average daily attendance pursuant to this article. The base grant for purposes of paragraph (2) shall be the lesser of the amount calculated pursuant to paragraph (2) or the sum of the entitlements for the charter school in the specified fiscal year as computed pursuant to paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (a), and paragraph (3) of subdivision (b), of Section 42238.03, multiplied by the ratio of local control funding formula base grant funding computed pursuant to subdivision (d) of
 Section 42238.02 to the local control funding formula amount for the fiscal year computed pursuant to Section 42238.02.

(4) If the sum of the funding transferred pursuant to this subdivision and the funding calculated pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 42238.03 exceeds the sum of the amounts calculated pursuant to subdivisions (e), (f), and (i) of Section 42238.02, the excess funding shall be used to offset funding calculated pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 42238.03.

(b) The sponsoring local educational agency shall transfer funding in lieu of property taxes to the charter school in monthly installments, by no later than the 15th of each month.

(1) For the months of August to February, inclusive, a charter school’s
 funding in lieu of property taxes shall be computed based on the amount of property taxes received by the sponsoring local educational agency during the preceding fiscal year, as reported to the Superintendent for purposes of the second principal apportionment. A sponsoring local educational agency shall transfer to the charter school the charter school’s estimated annual entitlement to funding in lieu of property taxes as follows:

(A) Six percent in August.

(B) Twelve percent in September.

(C) Eight percent each month in October, November, December, January, and February.

(2) For the months of March to June, inclusive, a charter school’s funding in lieu of
 property taxes shall be computed based on the amount of property taxes estimated to be received by the sponsoring local educational agency during the fiscal year, as reported to the Superintendent for purposes of the first principal apportionment. A sponsoring local educational agency shall transfer to each of its charter schools an amount equal to one-sixth of the difference between the school’s estimated annual entitlement to funding in lieu of property taxes and the amounts provided pursuant to paragraph (1). An additional one-sixth of this difference shall be included in the amount transferred in the month of March.

(3) For the month of July, a charter school’s funding in lieu of property taxes shall be computed based on the amount of property taxes estimated to be received by the sponsoring local educational agency during the prior
 fiscal year, as reported to the Superintendent for purposes of the second principal apportionment. A sponsoring local educational agency shall transfer to each of its charter schools an amount equal to the remaining difference between the school’s estimated annual entitlement to funding in lieu of property taxes and the amounts provided pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2).

(4) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 14002, final adjustments to the amount of funding in lieu of property taxes allocated to a charter school shall be made in June, in conjunction with the third recertification of annual apportionments to schools.

(5) Subdivision (a) and paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, do not apply for pupils who reside in, and are otherwise eligible to attend a school in, a basic
 aid school district, but who attend a charter school in a nonbasic aid school district. With regard to these pupils, the sponsoring basic aid school district shall transfer to the charter school an amount of funds equivalent to the local control funding formula grant pursuant to Section 42238.02, as implemented by Section 42238.03, earned through average daily attendance by the charter school for each pupil’s attendance, not to exceed the average property tax share per unit of average daily attendance for pupils residing and attending in the basic aid school district. The transfer of funds shall be made in not fewer than two installments at the request of the charter school, the first occurring not later than February 1 and the second not later than June 1 of each school year. Payments shall reflect the average daily attendance certified for the time periods of the first and second principal apportionments,
 respectively. The Superintendent may not apportion any funds for the attendance of pupils described in this subdivision unless the amount transferred by the basic aid school district is less than the local control funding formula grant pursuant to Section 42238.02, as implemented by Section 42238.03, earned by the charter school, in which event the Superintendent shall apportion the difference to the charter school from state funds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 24, Sec. 50.   (SB 98)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Other Operational Funding Available to Charter Schools [47636. - 47638.]

47636.

(a) This chapter shall not prevent a charter school from negotiating with a local educational agency for a share of operational funding from sources not otherwise set forth in this chapter including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Forest reserve revenues and other operational revenues received due to harvesting or extraction of minerals or other natural resources.

(2) Sales and use taxes, to the extent that the associated revenues are available for noncapital expenses of public schools.

(3) Parcel taxes, to the extent that the associated
 revenues are available for noncapital expenses of public schools.

(4) Ad valorem property taxes received by a school district which exceed its local control funding formula entitlement pursuant to Section 42238.02, as implemented by Section 42238.03.

(5) “Basic aid” received by a school district pursuant to Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution.

(b) This section shall become operative July 1, 2006.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 47, Sec. 86.   (AB 97)   Effective July 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

47638.

For purposes of determining eligibility for, and allocations of, lottery funds, a charter school shall be deemed to be a school district. The State Department of Education shall determine each charter school’s appropriate share of statewide total average daily attendance and include this information in its transmittals to the Controller for use in computing allocations of lottery funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 78, Sec. 32.8.   Effective July 7, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Special Education Funding [47640. - 47647.]

47640.

For the purposes of this article, “local educational agency” means a school district as defined in Section 41302.5 or a charter school that is deemed a local educational agency pursuant to Section 47641. As used in this article, “local educational agency” also means a charter school that is responsible for complying with all provisions of the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.) and implementing regulations as they relate to local educational agencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 78, Sec. 32.8.   Effective July 7, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

47641.

(a) A charter school that includes in its petition for establishment or renewal, or that otherwise provides, verifiable, written assurances that the charter school will participate as a local educational agency in a special education plan approved by the State Board of Education shall be deemed a local educational agency for the purposes of compliance with federal law (Individuals with Disabilities Education Act; 20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.) and for eligibility for federal and state special education funds. A charter school that is deemed a local educational agency for the purposes of special education pursuant to this article shall be permitted to participate in an approved special education local plan that is consistent with subdivision (a), (b), or (c) of Section 56195.1.

(b) A charter school that was granted a charter by a local educational agency that does not comply with subdivision (a) may not be deemed a local educational agency pursuant to this article, but shall be deemed a public school of the local educational agency that granted the charter.

(c) A charter school that has been granted a charter by the State Board of Education, and for which the board has delegated its supervisorial and oversight responsibilities pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (k) of Section 47605, and does not comply with subdivision (a), shall be deemed a public school of the local educational agency to which the board has delegated its supervisorial and oversight responsibilities.

(d) A charter school that has been granted a charter by the State Board of Education, and for which the board has not delegated its supervisorial and oversight responsibilities pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (k) of Section 47605, may not be deemed a local educational agency unless the charter school complies with subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 78, Sec. 32.8.   Effective July 7, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

47642.

Notwithstanding Section 47651, all state and federal funding for special education apportioned on behalf of pupils enrolled in a charter school shall be included in the allocation plan adopted pursuant to subdivision (i) of Section 56195.7 or Section 56836.05, or both, by the special education local plan area that includes the charter school.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 646, Sec. 23.4.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Applicable from July 1, 1999, by Sec. 47 of Ch. 646.)
-------------------------------------------

47643.

If the approval of a petition for a charter school requires a change to the allocation plan developed pursuant to subdivision (i) of Section 56195.7 or Section 56836.05, the change shall be adopted pursuant to the policymaking process of the special education local plan area.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 78, Sec. 32.8.   Effective July 7, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

47644.

For each charter school deemed a local educational agency for the purposes of special education, an amount equal to the amount computed pursuant to Section 56836.148 for the special education local plan area in which the charter school is included shall be apportioned by the Superintendent pursuant to the local allocation plan developed pursuant to subdivision (i) of Section 56195.7 or Section 56836.05, or both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 24, Sec. 51.   (SB 98)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

47645.

An agency reviewing a request by a charter school to participate as a local educational agency in a special education local plan area may not treat the charter school differently from the manner in which it treats a similar request made by a school district. In reviewing and approving a request by a charter school to participate as a local educational agency in a special education local plan area, a local or state agency shall ensure all of the following:

(a) The special education local plan area complies with Section 56140.

(b) The charter school participates in state and federal funding for special education and the allocation plan developed pursuant to subdivision (i) of Section 56195.7 or Section 56836.05 in the same manner as other local educational agencies of the special education local plan area.

(c) The charter school participates in governance of the special education local plan area and benefits from services provided throughout the special education local plan area, in the same manner as other local educational agencies of the special education local plan area.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 78, Sec. 32.8.   Effective July 7, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

47646.

(a) A charter school that is deemed to be a public school of the local educational agency that granted the charter for purposes of special education shall participate in state and federal funding for special education in the same manner as any other public school of that local educational agency. A child with disabilities attending the charter school shall receive special education instruction or designated instruction and services, or both, in the same manner as a child with disabilities who attends another public school of that local educational agency. The agency that granted the charter shall ensure that all children with disabilities enrolled in the charter school receive special education and designated instruction and services in a manner that is consistent with their individualized education program and is in compliance with the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.) and implementing regulations, including Section 300.209 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(b) In administering the local operation of special education pursuant to the local plan established pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 56205) of Part 30, in which the local educational agency that granted the charter participates, the local educational agency that granted the charter shall ensure that each charter school that is deemed a public school for purposes of special education receives an equitable share of special education funding and services consisting of either, or both, of the following:

(1) State and federal funding provided to support special education instruction or designated instruction and services, or both, provided or procured by the charter school that serves pupils enrolled in and attending the charter school. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a charter school may report average daily attendance to accommodate eligible pupils who require extended year services as part of an individualized education program.

(2) Any necessary special education services, including administrative and support services and itinerant services, that are provided by the local educational agency on behalf of pupils with disabilities enrolled in the charter school.

(c) In administering the local operation of special education pursuant to the local plan established pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 56205) of Part 30, in which the local educational agency that granted the charter participates, the local educational agency that granted the charter shall ensure that each charter school that is deemed a public school for purposes of special education also contributes an equitable share of its charter school block grant funding to support districtwide special education instruction and services, including, but not limited to, special education instruction and services for pupils with disabilities enrolled in the charter school.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 56, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

47647.

A local educational agency reviewing a petition for the establishment or renewal of a charter school may not refuse to grant the petition solely because the charter might enroll pupils with disabilities who reside in a special education local plan area other than the special education local plan area that includes the local educational agency reviewing the petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 78, Sec. 32.8.   Effective July 7, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Apportionment of Funds [47650. - 47655.]

47650.

A charter school shall be deemed to be a school district for purposes of determining the manner in which warrants are drawn on the State School Fund pursuant to Section 14041. For purposes of Section 14041, a charter school’s “total amount certified” means the state aid portion of the charter school’s total local control funding formula allocation pursuant to Section 42238.02, as implemented by Section 42238.03.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 923, Sec. 39.   (SB 971)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

47651.

(a) A charter school may receive the state aid portion of the charter school’s total local control funding formula allocation pursuant to Section 42238.02, as implemented by Section 42238.03, directly or through the local educational agency that either grants its charter or was designated by the state board.

(1) In the case of a charter school that elects to receive its funding directly, the warrant shall be drawn in favor of the county superintendent of schools of the county in which the local educational agency that granted the charter, or was designated by the state board as the oversight agency pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (k) of Section 47605, is located, for deposit to the appropriate funds or accounts of
 the charter school in the county treasury. The county superintendent of schools is authorized to establish appropriate funds or accounts in the county treasury for each charter school.

(2) In the case of a charter school that does not elect to receive its funding directly pursuant to this section, the warrant shall be drawn in favor of the county superintendent of schools of the county in which the local educational agency that granted the charter is located or was designated the oversight agency by the state board pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (k) of Section 47605, for deposit to the appropriate funds or accounts of the local educational agency.

(3) In the case of a charter school, the charter of which was granted by the state board, but for which the state board has not delegated oversight responsibilities pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (k) of Section 47605,
 the warrant shall be drawn in favor of the county superintendent of schools in the county where the local educational agency is located that initially denied the charter that was later granted by the state board. The county superintendent of schools is authorized to establish appropriate funds or accounts in the county treasury for each charter school.

(b) On or before June 1 of each year, a charter school electing to receive its funding directly shall so notify the county superintendent of schools of the county in which the local educational agency that granted the charter is located or, in the case of charters for which the state board has designated an oversight agency pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (k) of Section 47605, the county superintendent of schools of the county in which the designated oversight agency is located. An election to receive funding directly applies to all funding that the charter school is eligible to receive
 including, but not limited to, the local control funding formula allocation pursuant to Section 42238.02, as implemented by Section 42238.03, other state and federal categorical aid, and lottery funds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 99.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

47652.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 41330, a charter school in its first year of operation shall be eligible to receive funding for the advance apportionment based on an estimate of average daily attendance for the current fiscal year, as approved by the local educational agency that granted its charter and the county office of education in which the charter-granting agency is located. For charter schools approved by the state board, estimated average daily attendance shall be submitted directly to, and approved by, the department. Not later than five business days following the end of the first 20 schooldays, a charter school receiving funding pursuant to this section shall report to the department its actual average daily attendance for that first month, and the Superintendent shall adjust immediately, but not later than 45 days, the amount of its advance apportionment accordingly.

(b) In addition to funding received pursuant to Section 41330, a charter school in its second or later year of operation also shall be eligible to receive an advance apportionment pursuant to the process and conditions described in subdivision (a) in any year in which the charter school is adding at least one grade level. The average daily attendance funded for a new grade level shall not exceed the portion of the certified average daily attendance at the second principal apportionment for the prior year that was attributable to pupils in the highest grade served by the charter school.

(c) A charter school in its first year of operation may only commence instruction within the first three months of the fiscal year beginning July 1 of that year. A charter school shall not be eligible for an apportionment pursuant to subdivision (a), or any other apportionment for a fiscal year in which instruction commenced after September 30 of that fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 139, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

47653.

(a) A charter school required to be regarded as a continuing charter school by the department pursuant to subparagraph (E) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 47605, subparagraph (B) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 47605.1, subdivision (d) of Section 47605.9, or paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 47612.7 shall notify the department by May 15 before the fiscal year in which the charter school is to be regarded as a continuing charter school by the department, in a format to be established by the Superintendent. The Superintendent may require the charter school to submit attendance records or other documents necessary to verify that instruction had been provided at the site
 to substantiate that the charter school meets the requirements to be regarded as a continuing charter school by the department.

(b) Failure of an eligible charter school or its chartering authority to provide notice and substantiation to the department in accordance with subdivision (a) relieves the department of any obligation to regard the charter school as a continuing charter school.

(c) A charter school petition authorized by a different chartering authority pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 47605, subparagraph (A) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 47605.1, subdivision (c) of Section 47605.9, or subdivision (b) of Section 47612.7 shall be effective before the date instruction begins for the current fiscal year.

(d) A charter school regarded as
 a continuing charter school in accordance with this section shall commence instruction within the first three months of the fiscal year beginning July 1 of the year the petition is effective pursuant to subdivision (c). A charter school shall not be eligible for an apportionment for any fiscal year in which instruction commenced after September 30 of that fiscal year.

(e) A charter school regarded as a continuing charter school by the department shall not be eligible for funding as a new charter school pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 47652.

(f) The requirements of this section shall not be waived by the state board pursuant to Section 33050 or any other law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 124, Sec. 20.   (AB 938)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

47654.

The definitions set forth in this section apply for purposes of this part and Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 42238) of Part 24 of Division 3. “Affected charter school” means a charter school that has been, or is proposed to be, affected by an action to comply with subparagraph (A) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 47605, subparagraph (A) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 47605.1, subdivision (c) of Section 47605.9, or subdivision (b) of Section 47612.7. Affected charter schools include all of the following charter school types:

(a) (1) “Acquiring charter school” means a state charter school site deemed a continuing charter school that has wholly combined with one or more other affected state charter school sites by an action taken to
 comply with subdivision (c) of Section 47605.9. This paragraph shall become inoperative on July 1, 2026, unless its operation is extended by the Legislature.

(2) On the date paragraph (1) becomes inoperative, a charter school that meets the definition of an acquiring charter school pursuant to paragraph (1) shall no longer be regarded as a continuing charter school.

(b) “Continuing charter school” means a charter school that the department has deemed to have met the requirements of Section 47653.

(c) (1) “Divided charter school” means a continuing charter school that has had one or more of its sites become a separately authorized charter school by an action to comply with subparagraph (A) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 47605, subparagraph (A) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (c)
 of Section 47605.1, subdivision (c) of Section 47605.9, or subdivision (b) of Section 47612.7.

(2) The “restructured portion of a divided charter school” means the site or sites of the divided charter school that each become separately authorized by an action taken to comply with subparagraph (A) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 47605, subparagraph (A) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 47605.1, subdivision (c) of Section 47605.9, or subdivision (b) of Section 47612.7, and that is regarded as a continuing charter school in accordance with Section 47653.

(3) The “remaining portion of a divided charter school” means the portion of the original charter school remaining after action is taken to bring sites, resource centers, satellite facilities, and meeting spaces into compliance with subparagraph (A) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 47605,
 subparagraph (A) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 47605.1, subdivision (c) of Section 47605.9, or subdivision (b) of Section 47612.7.

(d) “Original charter school” means a charter school as it existed before an action taken to comply with subparagraph (A) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 47605, subparagraph (A) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 47605.1, subdivision (c) of Section 47605.9, or subdivision (b) of Section 47612.7.

(e) “Restructured charter school” means a transferred charter school, acquiring charter school, or divided charter school.

(f) “Transferred charter school” means a continuing charter school that is wholly authorized by a different chartering authority to comply with subparagraph (A) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 47605, subparagraph (A)
 of paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 47605.1, subdivision (c) of Section 47605.9, or subdivision (b) of Section 47612.7.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 48, Sec. 45.   (SB 114)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

47655.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, all debt and liabilities owed to the state for an original charter school shall transfer to a restructured charter school in accordance with this section.

(b) (1) A transferred charter school shall retain all of the debt and liabilities owed to the state incurred by, or applicable to, the original charter school for the period before the fiscal year the restructuring becomes effective.

(2) An acquiring charter school shall assume all of the debt and liabilities owed to the state incurred by, or applicable to, the original charter schools for the period before the fiscal year the restructuring becomes effective. This paragraph shall become
 inoperative on July 1, 2026, unless its operation is extended by the Legislature.

(3) For a divided charter school, the debt and liabilities owed to the state incurred by, or applicable to, the original charter school for the period before the fiscal year the restructuring becomes effective shall be the responsibility of the remaining portion of a divided charter school. If the remaining portion of a divided charter school closes, unassigned debt and liability owed to the state shall be the responsibility of the restructured charter schools.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 48, Sec. 46.   (SB 114)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Computations Affecting Sponsoring Local Educational Agencies [47660. - 47663.]

47660.

For purposes of computing eligibility for, and entitlements to, general purpose funding and operational funding for categorical programs, the enrollment and average daily attendance of a sponsoring local educational agency shall exclude the enrollment and attendance of pupils in its charter schools funded pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 47, Sec. 87.   (AB 97)   Effective July 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

47662.

For purposes of Section 42238.02, as implemented by Section 42238.03, the property tax revenues received by a sponsoring local educational agency pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 75) and Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 95) of Part 0.5 of the Revenue and Taxation Code shall be reduced by the amount of funding in lieu of property taxes allocated to a charter school or schools pursuant to Section 47635.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 15, Sec. 31.   (AB 99)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

47663.

(a) (1) For a pupil of a charter school sponsored by a basic aid school district who resides in, and is otherwise eligible to attend, a school district other than a basic aid school district, the Superintendent shall apportion to the sponsoring school district an amount equal to 70 percent of the local control funding formula base grant computed pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 42238.02, per unit of average daily attendance that would have been apportioned to the school district that the pupil resides in, and would otherwise have been eligible to attend.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), until the Superintendent determines that the school district the pupil resides in, and would otherwise have been eligible to attend, is funded
 pursuant to Section 42238.02, the Superintendent shall apportion, for average daily attendance pursuant to this article, the lesser of the amount calculated pursuant to paragraph (1) or 70 percent of the sum of the entitlements for the school district that the pupil resides in, and would otherwise have been eligible to attend, for the specified fiscal year as computed pursuant to paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (a), and paragraph (3) of subdivision (b), of Section 42238.03, divided by the average daily attendance for that fiscal year and then multiplied by the ratio of local control funding formula base grant funding computed pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 42238.02 to the local control funding formula amount for the fiscal year computed pursuant to Section 42238.02.

(3) If the entitlements for the school district the pupil resides in, and would otherwise have been eligible to
 attend, as computed pursuant to paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (a), and paragraph (3) of subdivision (b), of Section 42238.03, include funding calculated pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 42280) of Chapter 7 of Part 24 of Division 3 for a fiscal year, paragraph (2) shall not apply and the apportionment of state funds for the average daily attendance credited pursuant to this section for that fiscal year shall be calculated pursuant to paragraph (1).

(b) A school district that loses basic aid status as a result of transferring property taxes to a charter school or schools pursuant to Section 47635 for pupils who reside in, and are otherwise eligible to attend, a school district other than the school district that sponsors the charter school, shall be eligible to receive a pro rata share of funding provided by subdivision (a), with the proration factor calculated as the ratio of the following:

(1) The amount of property taxes that the school district receives in excess of its total base grant per unit of average daily attendance calculated pursuant to Section 42238.02, as implemented by Section 42238.03, before any transfers made pursuant to Section 47635, except for transfers in lieu of property taxes made for pupils who reside in, and would otherwise be eligible to attend, a school of the school district.

(2) The total amount in lieu of property taxes transferred pursuant to Section 47635 to the charter school or schools that it sponsors, except for transfers in lieu of property taxes made for pupils who reside in, and would otherwise be eligible to attend, a school of the school district.

(c) In no event shall the amount provided pursuant to this section exceed the amount in lieu of property taxes
 transferred on behalf of charter school pupils who do not reside in the school district, less the proportionate amount of base grant state aid provided pursuant to Section 42238.02, as implemented by Section 42238.03, that is attributable to the charter school pupils who do not reside in the school district.

(d) The Superintendent shall not apportion funds for the attendance of a pupil in a charter school of a nonbasic aid school district who resides in, and is otherwise eligible to attend school in, a basic aid school district unless the pupil is subject to the exceptions set forth in paragraph (5) of subdivision (b), and subdivision (c), of Section 47635.

(e) For purposes of this section, “basic aid school district” means a school district that does not receive from the state, for any fiscal year in which the subdivision is applied, an apportionment of state funds as described
 in subdivision (o) of Section 42238.02.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 32, Sec. 45.   (AB 1808)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 27. PUPILS [48000. - 49703.]



  CHAPTER 1. Admission [48000. - 48071.]



  ARTICLE 1. Kindergartens [48000. - 48004.]

48000.

(a) A child shall be admitted to a kindergarten maintained by the school district at the beginning of a school year, or at a later time in the same year, if the child will have their fifth birthday on or before one of the following dates:

(1) December 2 of the 2011–12 school year.

(2) November 1 of the 2012–13 school year.

(3) October 1 of the 2013–14 school year.

(4) September 1 of the 2014–15 school year and each school year thereafter.

(b) The governing board of the school district of a school district
 maintaining one or more kindergartens may, on a case-by-case basis, admit to a kindergarten a child having attained the age of five years at any time during the school year with the approval of the parent or guardian, subject to the following conditions:

(1) The governing board of the school district determines that the admittance is in the best interests of the child.

(2) The parent or guardian is given information regarding the advantages and disadvantages and any other explanatory information about the effect of this early admittance.

(c) (1) As a condition of receipt of apportionment for pupils in a transitional kindergarten program pursuant to Section 46300, and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 47610) of Part 26.8, as applicable, a school district or charter school shall ensure the
 following:

(A) In the 2012–13 school year, a child who will have their fifth birthday between November 2 and December 2 shall be admitted to a transitional kindergarten program maintained by the school district or charter school.

(B) In the 2013–14 school year, a child who will have their fifth birthday between October 2 and December 2 shall be admitted to a transitional kindergarten program maintained by the school district or charter school.

(C) From the 2014–15 school year to the 2021–22 school year, inclusive, a child who will have their fifth birthday between September 2 and December 2 shall be admitted to a transitional kindergarten program maintained by the school district or charter school.

(D) In the 2022–23 school year, a child who will have
 their fifth birthday between September 2 and February 2 shall be admitted to a transitional kindergarten program maintained by the school district or charter school.

(E) In the 2023–24 school year, a child who will have their fifth birthday between September 2 and April 2 shall be admitted to a transitional kindergarten program maintained by the school district or charter school.

(F) In the 2024–25 school year, a child who will have their fifth birthday between September 2 and June 2 shall be admitted to a transitional kindergarten program maintained by the school district or charter school.

(G) In the 2025–26 school year, and in each school year thereafter, a child who will have their fourth birthday by September 1 shall be admitted to a transitional kindergarten program maintained by the school district or charter
 school.

(2) (A) In any school year, a school district or charter school may, at any time during a school year, admit a child to a transitional kindergarten program who will have their fifth birthday after the date specified for the applicable year in subparagraphs (A) to (F), inclusive, of paragraph (1) but during that same school year, with the approval of the parent or guardian, subject to the following conditions:

(i) The governing board of the school district or the governing body of the charter school determines that the admittance is in the best interests of the child.

(ii) The parent or guardian is given information regarding the advantages and disadvantages and any other explanatory information about the effect of this early admittance.

(B) Notwithstanding any other law, a pupil admitted to a transitional kindergarten program pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall not generate average daily attendance for purposes of Section 46300, or be included in the enrollment or unduplicated pupil count pursuant to Section 42238.02, until the pupil has attained the pupil’s fifth birthday, regardless of when the pupil was admitted during the school year.
